Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1604 of Title 22, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving
fund for the Office of the Attorney General to be designated the
“Domestic Violence Fatality Review Board Revolving Fund”. The fund
shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations,
and shall consist of all monies received from legislative
appropriations. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are
hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Office
of the Attorney General for the purposes provided in subsection B of
this section. Expenditures from the fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1295 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

pres cribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
B. The purpose of the fund is to develop a state and local
database on domestic violence deaths pursuant to paragraph 3 of
subsection A of Section 1601 of Title 22 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Such database shall be developed and implemented within twenty-four
(24) months of the effective date of this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON APPROPRIATIONS
February 18, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED











SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1295 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)